Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,196.01
Driving under influence of alcoholic
liquor or drug; additional penalty.

In addition to any other penalty provided
for operating a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196, if a person
has a prior conviction as defined in section 60-6,197.02 for a violation punishable
as a felony under section 60-6,197.03 and is subsequently found to have operated
or been in the actual physical control of any motor vehicle when such person
has (1) a concentration of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of
alcohol per one hundred milliliters of his or her blood or (2) a concentration
of two-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of his or her breath, such person shall be guilty of a Class IIIA
misdemeanor.

Laws 2011, LB675, § 7.